New York, session 2025-2026, S8270.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The opening paragraph of paragraph b of subdivision 2 of 2 part B of section 236 of the domestic relations law, as added by chapter 3 72 of the laws of 2009, is amended and a new subparagraph 6 is added to 4 read as follows: 5 With respect to matrimonial actions which commence on or after the 6 effective date of this paragraph, the plaintiff shall cause to be served 7 upon the defendant, simultaneous with the service of the summons, a copy 8 of the automatic orders set forth in this paragraph. The automatic 9 orders shall take effect and be binding upon the plaintiff in a matrimo- 10 nial action immediately upon the filing of the summons, or summons and 11 complaint, and shall be binding upon the defendant immediately upon the 12 service of the automatic orders with the summons. [The] Each automatic 13 [orders] order shall remain in full force and effect [during the penden- 14 cy of the action,] until the judgment of divorce is entered or the 15 action is dismissed, discontinued or stayed, whichever shall occur 16 first, unless the order is terminated, modified or amended by further 17 order of the court upon motion of either of the parties or upon written 18 agreement between the parties duly executed and acknowledged. The auto- 19 matic orders are as follows: 20 (6) If either party receives notice of a tax lien, foreclosure, bank- 21 ruptcy, or litigation, or the filing of same, or of the lifting of a 22 stay in bankruptcy, that could adversely affect the marital estate, that 23 party shall, within ten days after receiving such notice, send written 24 notice of such event to the other party. 25 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 26 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08998-01-5